Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-618
Construction; contracts and agreements; conditions.

After the passage and publication of said resolution, said city or village shall have authority to enter into contracts and agreements with any railroad company or companies over or under whose railroad such structure is to be constructed providing for the construction and maintenance of such viaduct or subway and for the apportionment of the costs thereof; Provided, such agreement or contract shall not be effective nor shall any work be commenced until after such matter is submitted to a vote of the electors as hereinafter provided.

Laws 1949, c. 28, § 2, p. 103.